Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3064.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:
(1) Rhode Island faces an ongoing and worsening projected shortage of physicians and
healthcare professionals, particularly in primary care and underserved communities;
(2) Establishing a medical school at the University of Rhode Island would strengthen the
state's healthcare workforce pipeline, improve access to care, and support long-term economic
development; and
(3) An initial state investment is necessary to support leadership recruitment, faculty hiring,
accreditation planning, and curriculum development for such medical school.
SECTION 2. Chapter 16-32 of the General Laws entitled "University of Rhode Island [See
Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding
thereto the following section:
16-32-43. University of Rhode Island medical school -- Establishment and funding.
(a) For fiscal year 2027, the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby appropriated
from general revenues to the University of Rhode Island for the purpose of initiating the
establishment of a medical school.
(b) Funds appropriated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be used for operating
expenses and salaries related to, including, but not limited to:
(1) Hiring a founding dean and senior leadership;
(2) Recruitment of core faculty and administrative staff;

(3) Accreditation preparation and compliance activities; and
(4) Curriculum planning and institutional development.
(c) It is the intent of the general assembly that the fiscal year 2027 appropriation represents
the first phase of a multi-year state investment to support the development of a medical school at
the University of Rhode Island.
(d) Subject to future appropriations, the general assembly anticipates additional funding in
the following amounts:
(1) Fiscal year 2028: Seven million dollars ($7,000,000); and
(2) Fiscal year 2029: Eight million dollars ($8,000,000).
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring any future general assembly to
appropriate such funds.
(f) The University of Rhode Island shall submit a report to the governor and the general
assembly no later than January 1, 2028, detailing:
(1) The use of funds appropriated under this section;
(2) Progress toward accreditation and institutional readiness;
(3) Faculty and leadership hiring progress; and
(4) A projected timeline and budget for subsequent phases of development.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005342
========
LC005342 - Page 2 of 3